Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.1, subsection 36A, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: âLow-speed electric bicycleâ means a device having equipped with a saddle or seat for the use of a rider, two or three wheels , equipped with fully operable pedals, and an electric motor of less than that produces not more than seven hundred fifty watts that meets , and is classified in accordance with the following requirements of one of the following classes : Sec. 2. Section 321.1, subsection 51A, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 51A. âPedestrian conveyanceâ means any human-powered device by which a pedestrian may move other than by walking or by which a pedestrian may move another person, including but not limited to a wheelchair, stroller, skateboard, scooter, or other similar device. âPedestrian conveyanceâ also includes an electric personal assistive mobility device and any other device used to move a person sitting or standing on the device regardless of whether the device is powered by an electric Senate File 490, p. 2 motor, so long as the electric motor produces less not more than seven hundred fifty watts. âPedestrian conveyanceâ does not include a bicycle. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 490, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor